src/morphology/affixes/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON DABALAS  !!= * __@CODE@__   -laš adjectives with short Adv/Comp forms
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ; 
             :ažž DEARVVASLAS2 ;
     +Err/Orth:ážž  DEARVVASLAS2 ; ! This form (á pro a) is wrong but common. Sub.
             +A:ažža NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA- ;
     +Err/Orth+A:ážža ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA-  !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: PxV ; ! ! tentative.
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:t K ; 
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:n%> PxC ; ! ! tentative, check.
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Attr+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X4b%> K ;  ! Comp are also Attr.
 +Comp+Err/Orth:X4b Rreal ;    
 +Comp+Err/Orth:X4b»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj, no compound.
! +Comp#+Err/Orth:X4b»# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj
 +Comp#+Err/Orth+Use/Circ:X4b»# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4bu K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4bu K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:X4b K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:X4but K ;
 +Comp+Ess+Use/NG:X4bun K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»uš%> ATTRCONT ; 
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:X4b»uš K ;
 +Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:X4b»užža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +Comp+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:X4buj K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X4bus K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4bun K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Comp+Sg+Com+Use/NG:X4bujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:X4bujd K ;
 +Comp+Cmp/PlGen:X4bujd R ;
 +Comp+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:X4bujd K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:X4bujdda K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:X4bujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4bujs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Comp+Pl+Com+Use/NG:X4bujgujn K ;
 +Comp+Pl+Com/Sh:X4buj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Comp+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bustti%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujnni%> PxV ;
! +Comp+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:X4bujddi%> PxV ; !^P^ !MARG
 +Comp+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujddi%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujddi%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujddás%> PxC ;
 +Comp+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujnni%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bujddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Comp+Der2+Der/at+Adv:X4but K ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px1V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px2V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4bu%> Px3V ;
 +Comp+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4busa%> PxV ;
 +Comp+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Err/Orth:X4buiddá%> Px1V ;
 +Superl+Use/NG:X4muss BUOREMUS ; 
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:X4t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth:t K ;
 HEAPMIOBL ;



LEXICON DEARVVASLAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  -laš adjectives without short Adv/Comp forms.
        DEARVVASLAS2 ; 
 +A:a%> ISSORASSA- ;

LEXICON DEARVVASLAS2  !!= * __@CODE@__  just to lift out ISSORASSA-
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +A+Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;			! test this
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
! +A+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ; -  L2
! word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš not directed here, but to DABALAS
 
LEXICON STUORIBUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  -buš comparatives
 +A+Comp+Attr:%> K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%> K ;
! +A+Comp+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:%> R ;			! test this - L2
! +A+Comp+Cmp/SgGen:%> R ;
 +A+Comp+Err/Orth: VUOHTA ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +A+Comp:a%> EABBUCASE2 ;

! word dearvvaslaš/dearvvašlaš not directed here, but to DABALAS

LEXICON ASEHAS !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:%>is VUOHTA ; L2
 +A+Sg+Nom:ažž%> K ;
! +A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:ažž%> R ;			! test this L2
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:ažž%> R ;
 +A:ažža%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON UNOHAS   !!= * __@CODE@__  for this word only
 +A+Use/NG:%>as ATTR ;
 +A:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA - L2
 +A:as JOHTOLAT0 ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:as%> K ;
! +A+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-Spell:as%> R ;			! test this L2
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:as%> R ;
 +A:assa%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON IPMAHA  !!= * __@CODE@__ Tris. Gradating C-adj:s, The Troms declension: imaš:ipmaha, gáđaš:gáhtaha
 +A:š%>X4 MALIS0 ;
! +A+Use/-Spell:š%>X4 R ; L2
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:h%>X2 PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen:h%>X2a K ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:h%>X2 K ;
 +A+Cmp/SgGen:h%>X2a R ; !compound also for these
 +A+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:h%>X2 R ; ! !compound also for these
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:h%>X2 PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc:h%>X2a K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:h%>X2 K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:h%>X2 PxC ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip:h%>X2at K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:h%>X2ak K ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:h%>X2asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:h%>X2ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +A:h%>X2i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;
 +A:h%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT_NVD ;






!! !!Trisyllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON MEAHTTUS  !!= * __@CODE@__  meahttun-adj. with comp. and superl. forms -seabbo, -seamos etc.
 +A:n%> ATTR ;
 +A:s%> EABBO/EAMOS_NVD ;
 +A:m%> ADVC ; !Adverb form -meahttumit
 +A:m%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Gen:m%>a R ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:m%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:m%>at K ;
 +A:m%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:m%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:m%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:m%> K ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:m%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:m%>iiddá%> Px1V ;
! +A+Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:m%>at VUOHTA ;  L2

LEXICON BEAKKAN  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A+Err/Orth:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>iiddá%> Px1V ;
! +A+Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at VUOHTA ;  L2
 
LEXICON BEAKKAN_NOCOMP  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
! +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>iiddá%> Px1V ;
! +A+Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at VUOHTA ;  L2

LEXICON GEARDAN  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. without Separate Attr.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A+Err/Orth:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;   ! NE and vuohta
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>a K ; ! Stem vowel -a-, no short genitive
 +A+Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +A:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABUadj- ;  ! obl
 +A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:%>asa%> PxV ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +A+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%> K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>iiddá%> Px1V ;
! +A+Pl+Nom+Use/-Spell:%>at VUOHTA ;  L2

LEXICON JOHTIL  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.
 +A:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;    ! NE and vuohta
 +A:%> MALLASadj- ;    ! leads to MALLAS- and then to MALLASI-/NUORABU-
                  ! Has stem vowel -a- but also short genitive

LEXICON HEITTOHA  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyll. Non-gradating C-Adj. with is-Attr.
 +A+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>is ATTR ;
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_NVD ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;    ! NE and vuohta
 +A:%> MALLASadj-_NVD ;    ! leads to MALLAS- and then to MALLASI-/NUORABU-
                  ! Has stem vowel -a- but also short genitive
