src/morphology/stems/adjectives-L2.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpejeavddalaš+CmpN/First:eahpe#jeavddal DABALAS ;
eahpefysalaš+CmpN/First:eahpe#fysal DABALAS ;
LEXICON Adjective
allaseđolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:alla#seđol DABALAS ;
almmialit:almmi#alih BEAKKAN ;
asehaš:aseh ASEHAS "thin A" ;
asihaš:asi7h ASEHAS ;
doaibmameahttun:doaibmameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
jurdilmeahttun:jurdilmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
bahábeakkálmas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#beakkálmass DEARVVASLAS ;
bahánáhkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#náhkál DABALAS ;
barggeš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:barggeš JOHTIL; !
beakkán+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:beakkán BEAKKAN; !
oahpatmeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oahpatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
bisovaš:bisovažž DEARVVASLAS ;
bivnnut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bivnnuh JOHTIL ;
boranas:boranass DEARVVASLAS ;
caggameahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:caggameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
deaivil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:deaivil JOHTIL; !
deđot:de7đog BEAKKAN ;
diehttevaš:diehttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
diđolaš:diđol DABALAS ;
dollagierdevaš:dolla#gierdevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
dovdameahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dovdameahttu MEAHTTUS ;
duhttivaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhttivažž DEARVVASLAS ;
duostil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duostil JOHTIL; !
eaŋkil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:eaŋkil JOHTIL; !
ekstremisttalaš:ekstremisttal DABALAS ;
garvemeahttun+Err/Sub:garvi7meahttu MEAHTTUS ;
gerelmas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gerelmass DEARVVASLAS ;
gierdevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gierdevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
gilles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gilles JOHTIL; !
girjjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:girjjag BEAKKAN ;
gabbagirjjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gabba#girjjag BEAKKAN ;
govttolaš+Err/Sub:gohtol DABALAS ;
golmmageardán:golmma#geardán GEARDAN ;
gaskageardán:gaska#geardán GEARDAN ;
guhkebuš:guhkebužž STUORIBUS ;
guhkálmas:guhkálmass DEARVVASLAS ;
guohttul+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guohttul JOHTIL; !
guovddáš:guovddáž BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
guovddáš+Err/Sub:guovddaž BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
guovttegeardán:guovtte#geardán GEARDAN ;
gáfat:gáfad BEAKKAN ;
gáđaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:gáh'ta IPMAHA ;
heittot+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:heittoh HEITTOHA ;
heittot:heittog JOHTIL ; ! also :heittoh
heivetmeahttun:heivetmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
seagálaš:seagál DABALAS ;
háváš:háváž BEAKKAN ; ! -times				   !
njealjeoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njealje#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
moattioaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moatti#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
ruškesoaivvat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruškes#oaivvag BEAKKAN ;
iešvuđot:ieš#vu7đog BEAKKAN ;
imaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/NG:ipma IPMAHA ;
jeavddalaš:jeavddal DABALAS ;
jádnil:jádnil JOHTIL ;
jápmemeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jápmemeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
lagabuš:lagabužž STUORIBUS ;
lobálaš+Err/Sub:lobal DABALAS ;
luohttevaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luohttevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
luvvil:luvvil JOHTIL ;
mađáš:mađáž BEAKKAN ;
mihtitmeahttun:mihtitmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
máttibuš:máttibužž STUORIBUS ;
máŋggageardán:máŋgga#geardán GEARDAN ;
máššil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:máššil JOHTIL; !
nanadáhtolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nana#dáhtol DABALAS ;
nealguvaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nealguvažž DEARVVASLAS ;
njealjegeardán:njealje#geardán GEARDAN ;
nuppát:nuppád BEAKKAN_NOCOMP ;
nággár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nággár JOHTIL ;
oanehaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oaneh ASEHAS ;
oktageardán:okta#geardán GEARDAN ;
oktiisoahppevaš:oktii#soahppevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
olatmeahttun:olatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
olggubuš:olggubužž STUORIBUS ;
ovttageardán:ovtta#geardán GEARDAN "simple A" ;
passiivvalaš:passiivval DABALAS ;
ravddabuš:ravddabužž STUORIBUS ;
rihkolaš:rihkol DABALAS ;
rittubuš:rittubužž STUORIBUS ;
seainnibuš:seainnibužž STUORIBUS ;
sihtavaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sihtavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
siskkibuš:siskkibužž STUORIBUS ;
skuhttár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:skuhttár JOHTIL; !
skárllat:skárllag BEAKKAN ;
sokkibuš:sokkibužž STUORIBUS ;
sorjavaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sorjavažž DEARVVASLAS ;
sorjjasmeahttun:sorjjasmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
sosialisttalaš:sosi^alisttal DABALAS ;
stuorebuš:stuorebužž STUORIBUS ;
ulbmillaš+Err/Sub:ulbmáll DABALAS ;
unohas:unoh UNOHAS ;
vardil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vardil JOHTIL; !
veasttabuš:veasttabužž STUORIBUS ;
viđageardán:viđa#geardán GEARDAN ;
vuollegaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolleg ASEHAS ;
vuolligaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuolli7g ASEHAS ;
vuonabuš:vuonabužž STUORIBUS ;
vuordemeahttun:vuordemeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
váribuš:váribužž STUORIBUS ;
áddevaš:áddevažž DEARVVASLAS ;
áigodatlaš:áigodatl DABALAS ;
árggebuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:árggebužž STUORIBUS ;
árvitmeahttun:árvitmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
ávdin:ávdim BEAKKAN ;
áđabuš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:áđabužž STUORIBUS ;
čeahkit:čeahkid JOHTIL ;
čáskatmeahttun:čáskatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
čorgatmeahttun+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čorgatmeahttu MEAHTTUS ;
jiešválddat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#válddag BEAKKAN ;
